Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-706
Life insurance; minors; policy options; applicant may exercise.

Subject to the rights of any person other than the minor whose life is insured, the applicant for a policy upon the life of a minor may during the lifetime of said minor and prior to the time such minor shall be ten years of age at nearest birthday, exercise any option contained in said policy in all respects the same as though such applicant were the person insured by or the owner of said policy, and, under like circumstances, shall be entitled to collect and receive all sums payable upon or on account of such policy.

Laws 1937, c. 102, § 1, p. 359;

Laws 1941, c. 85, § 1, p. 333;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 44-804;

R.S.1943, § 44-706;

Laws 1969, c. 373, § 3, p. 1331.